District of Columbia statutes.
47-395.03

Repealed

Implementation of plans.

Repealed.

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 732, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11104
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 52(k), 46 DCR 2118
Mar. 5, 1999, 113 Stat. 3, Pub. L. 106-1, § 3(a)
1981 Ed., § 47-395.3.

Section 47-395.3 had been amended by § 52(k) of D.C. Law 12-264; however, effect was given to the repeal by Pub. L. 106-1.

Department heads report solely to Authority: Section 1604(f)(2)(B) of Pub. L. 105-34, 111 Stat. 1049, provided that notwithstanding § 11104(b)(3) of the Balanced Budget Act of 1997 (former paragraph (b)(3) of this section), in carrying out any of the management reform plans under such section, the head of a department of the government of the District of Columbia shall report solely to the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority.